Washington statutes.
RCW 43.320.080

Director to maintain office in Olympia—Record of receipts and disbursements—Deposit of funds.

The director of financial institutions shall maintain an office at the state capitol, but may with the consent of the governor also maintain branch offices at other convenient business centers in this state. The director shall keep books of record of all moneys received or disbursed by the director into or from the financial services regulation fund, and any other accounts maintained by the department of financial institutions.

[ 2001 c 177 s 1; 1993 c 472 s 22; 1965 c 8 s 43.19.050. Prior: 1917 c 80 s 4; RRS s 3211. Formerly RCW 43.19.050.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2001 c 177: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect July 1, 2001." [ 2001 c 177 s 16.]